Illinois, session 104th, SB1161.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Springfield High Speed Railroad Community 5Advisory Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (610 ILCS 135/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Springfield High Speed Railroad Community Advisory Act.9(Source: P.A. 99-465, eff. 8-26-15.)